District of Columbia statutes.
38-606

Duty to obtain treatment.

If a student is excluded from school pursuant to subchapter II of Chapter 1 of Title 7, it shall be his or her responsibility if an adult student, and the responsibility of his or her parent(s) or guardian if a minor student, to obtain any treatment necessary for him or her to resume attendance at school. If private health care is not available or desired, the Mayor shall ensure that the necessary treatment is made available by public health authorities after obtaining the consent of the parent(s), guardian, adult student, or, when authorized by District law, minor student. Fees shall be determined in the same manner as provided in § 38-605.

History

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-66, § 7, 32 DCR 6086

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2406.